Utah statutes.
31A-22-639.   Statement of preauthorization.

(1)  An insurer who requires preauthorization or preapproval for coverage under accident and health insurance shall, beginning January 1, 2011, provide an enrollee with a statement of preauthorization if:

(a)  the applicable CPT codes have been submitted to the insurer to determine whether a particular procedure is covered under the terms of the accident and health insurance policy;

(b)  the enrollee has met the requirements for preauthorization of the procedure or encounter; and

(c)  the enrollee requests a statement of preauthorization.

(2)  A statement of preauthorization under Subsection (1) may be sent:

(a)  by mail; or

(b)  electronically.

(3)  A statement of preauthorization shall include a statement that the preauthorization is:

(a)  not a guarantee of payment by an insurer; and

(b)  subject to the policy and contract provisions of the accident and health insurance contract.



Enacted by Chapter 204, 2010 General Session

